Utah statutes.
78B-3-205.   Acts submitting person to jurisdiction.
Notwithstanding Section 16-10a-1501, any person or personal representative of
the person, whether or not a citizen or resident of this state, who, in person
or through an agent, does any of the following enumerated acts is subject to
the jurisdiction of the courts of this state as to any claim arising out of or
related to:
(1)  the transaction of any business within this state;
(2)  contracting to supply services or goods in this state;
(3)  the causing of any injury within this state whether tortious or by breach
of warranty;
(4)  the ownership, use, or possession of any real estate situated in this
state;
(5)  contracting to insure any person, property, or risk located within this
state at the time of contracting;
(6)  with respect to actions of divorce, separate maintenance, or child
support, having resided, in the marital relationship, within this state
notwithstanding subsequent departure from the state; or the commission in this
state of the act giving rise to the claim, so long as that act is not a mere
omission, failure to act, or occurrence over which the defendant had no
control; or
(7)  the commission of sexual intercourse within this state which gives rise
to a paternity suit under Title 78B, Chapter 15, Utah Uniform Parentage Act,
to determine paternity for the purpose of establishing responsibility for
child support.
